California, session 20252026, AB60.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This bill shall be known, and may be cited, as the Musk Reduction Act.SEC. 2. Section 108980 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:108980. (a) Commencing January 1, 2025, a person or entity shall not manufacture, sell, deliver, hold, or offer for sale in commerce any cosmetic product that contains any of the following intentionally added ingredients:(1) Dibutyl phthalate (CAS no. 84-74-2).(2) Diethylhexyl phthalate (CAS no. 117-81-7).(3) Formaldehyde (CAS no. 50-00-0).(4) Paraformaldehyde (CAS no. 30525-89-4).(5) Methylene glycol (CAS no. 463-57-0).(6) Quaternium-15 (CAS no. 51229-78-8).(7) Mercury (CAS no. 7439-97-6).(8) Isobutylparaben (CAS no. 4247-02-3).(9) Isopropylparaben (CAS no. 4191-73-5).(10) m-Phenylenediamine and its salts (CAS no. 108-45-2).(11) o-Phenylenediamine and its salts (CAS no. 95-54-5).(12) The following per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) and their salts:(A) Perfluorooctane sulfonate (PFOS); heptadecafluorooctane-1-sulfonic acid (CAS no. 1763-23-1).(B) Potassium perfluorooctanesulfonate; potassium heptadecafluorooctane-1-sulfonate (CAS no. 2795-39-3).(C) Diethanolamine perfluorooctane sulfonate (CAS 70225-14-8).(D) Ammonium perfluorooctane sulfonate; ammonium heptadecafluorooctanesulfonate (CAS 29081-56-9).(E) Lithium perfluorooctane sulfonate; lithium heptadecafluorooctanesulfonate (CAS 29457-72-5).(F) Perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA)(CAS no. 335-67-1).(G) Ammonium pentadecafluorooctanoate (CAS no. 3825-26-1).(H) Nonadecafluorodecanoic acid (CAS no. 355-76-2).(I) Ammonium nonadecafluorodecanoate (CAS no. 3108-42-7).(J) Sodium nonadecafluorodecanoate (CAS no. 3830-45-3).(K) Perfluorononanoic acid (PFNA)(CAS no. 375-95-1).(L) Sodium heptadecafluorononanoate (CAS no. 21049-39-8).(M) Ammonium perfluorononanoate (CAS no. 4149-60-4).(b) Commencing January 1, 2027, no person or entity shall manufacture, sell, deliver, hold, or offer for sale in commerce any cosmetic product that contains any of the following intentionally added ingredients:(1) Lily aldehyde (CAS no. 80-54-6).(2) Acetaldehyde (CAS no. 75-07-0).(3) Cyclohexylamine (CAS no. 108-91-8).(4) Cyclotetrasiloxane (CAS no. 556-67-2).(5) Phytonadione (CAS no. 84-80-0).(6) Sodium perborate (CAS no. 15120-21-5).(7) Styrene (CAS no. 100-42-5).(8) Trichloroacetic acid (CAS no. 76-03-9).(9) Tricresyl phosphate (CAS no. 1330-78-5).(10) Vinyl acetate (CAS no. 108-05-4).(11) 2-Chloracetamide (CAS no. 79-07-2).(12) Allyl isothiocyanate (CAS no. 57-06-7).(13) Anthraquinone (CAS no. 84-65-1).(14) Malachite green (CAS no. 569-64-2).(15) Oil from the seeds of Laurus nobilis L. (CAS no. 84603-73-6).(16) Pyrogallol (CAS no. 87-66-1).(17) C.I. disperse blue 1 (CAS no. 2475-45-8).(18) Trisodium nitrilotriacetate (CAS no. 5064-31-3).(19) The following boron substances:(A) Perboric acids:(i) Sodium salt (CAS no. 11138-47-9).(ii) Sodium salt, monohydrate (CAS no. 12040-72-1).(iii) Sodium perborate monohydrate (CAS no. 10332-33-9).(B) Boric acid (CAS nos. 10043-35-3 and 11113-50-1).(C) Borates, tetraborates, octaborates, and boric acid salts and esters, including all of the following:(i) Disodium octaborate anhydrous (CAS no. 12008-41-2).(ii) Disodium octaborate tetrahydrate (CAS no. 12280-03-4).(iii) 2-Aminoethanol, monoester with boric acid (CAS no. 10377-81-8).(iv) 2-Hydroxypropyl ammonium dihydrogen orthoborate (CAS no. 68003-13-4).(v) Potassium borate, boric acid potassium salt (CAS no. 12712-38-8).(vi) Trioctyldodecyl borate.(vii) Zinc borate (CAS no. 1332-07-6).(viii) Sodium borate, disodium tetraborate anhydrous; boric acid, sodium salt (CAS no. 1330-43-4).(ix) Tetraboron disodium heptaoxide, hydrate (CAS no. 12267-73-1).(x) Orthoboric acid, sodium salt (CAS no. 13840-56-7).(xi) Disodium tetraborate decahydrate; borax decahydrate (CAS no. 1303-96-4).(xii) Disodium tetraborate pentahydrate; borax pentahydrate (CAS no. 12179-04-3).(20) C.I. disperse blue 3 (CAS no. 2475-46-9).(21) Basic green 1 (CAS no. 633-03-4).(22) Basic blue 7 (CAS no. 2390-60-5).(23) 3(or5)-((4-(benzylmethylamino)phenyl)azo)-1,2 -(or1,4)-dimethyl-1H-1,2,4-triazolium and its salts (CAS nos. 89959-98-8 and 12221-69-1).(24) Basic violet 4 (CAS no. 2390-59-2).(25) Basic blue 3 (CAS no. 33203-82-6).(26) Basic blue 9 (CAS no. 61-73-4).(27) Musk ambrette (CAS no. 83-66-9).(28) Musk tibetene (CAS no.145-39-1).(29) Musk moskene (CAS no. 116-66-5).(30) Musk xylene (CAS no. 81-15-2).(c) (1) Commencing January 1, 2027, a person or entity shall not manufacture, sell, deliver, hold, or offer for sale in commerce a cosmetic product that contains more than 1.4 percent in fine fragrance products, 0.56 percent in eau de toilette, 0 percent in oral products, and 0.042 percent in all other products of musk ketone (CAS no. 81-14-1).(2) “Oral products” means a cosmetic product that is intended to be applied on teeth or the mucous membranes of the oral cavity.(d) If a cosmetic product made through manufacturing processes intended to comply with this chapter contains a technically unavoidable trace quantity of an ingredient listed in subdivision (a) or (b) and that trace quantity stems from impurities of natural or synthetic ingredients, the manufacturing process, storage, or migration from packaging, that trace quantity shall not cause the cosmetic product to be in violation of this section.(e) For purposes of this section, “ingredient” has the same meaning as defined in Section 111791.5.SEC. 2.5. Section 108980 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:108980. (a) Commencing January 1, 2025, a person or entity shall not manufacture, sell, deliver, hold, or offer for sale in commerce any cosmetic product that contains any of the following intentionally added ingredients:(1) Dibutyl phthalate (CAS no. 84-74-2).(2) Diethylhexyl phthalate (CAS no. 117-81-7).(3) Formaldehyde (CAS no. 50-00-0).(4) Paraformaldehyde (CAS no. 30525-89-4).(5) Methylene glycol (CAS no. 463-57-0).(6) Quaternium-15 (CAS no. 51229-78-8).(7) Mercury (CAS no. 7439-97-6).(8) Isobutylparaben (CAS no. 4247-02-3).(9) Isopropylparaben (CAS no. 4191-73-5).(10) m-Phenylenediamine and its salts (CAS no. 108-45-2).(11) o-Phenylenediamine and its salts (CAS no. 95-54-5).(12) The following per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) and their salts:(A) Perfluorooctane sulfonate (PFOS); heptadecafluorooctane-1-sulfonic acid (CAS no. 1763-23-1).(B) Potassium perfluorooctanesulfonate; potassium heptadecafluorooctane-1-sulfonate (CAS no. 2795-39-3).(C) Diethanolamine perfluorooctane sulfonate (CAS 70225-14-8).(D) Ammonium perfluorooctane sulfonate; ammonium heptadecafluorooctanesulfonate (CAS 29081-56-9).(E) Lithium perfluorooctane sulfonate; lithium heptadecafluorooctanesulfonate (CAS 29457-72-5).(F) Perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA)(CAS no. 335-67-1).(G) Ammonium pentadecafluorooctanoate (CAS no. 3825-26-1).(H) Nonadecafluorodecanoic acid (CAS no. 355-76-2).(I) Ammonium nonadecafluorodecanoate (CAS no. 3108-42-7).(J) Sodium nonadecafluorodecanoate (CAS no. 3830-45-3).(K) Perfluorononanoic acid (PFNA)(CAS no. 375-95-1).(L) Sodium heptadecafluorononanoate (CAS no. 21049-39-8).(M) Ammonium perfluorononanoate (CAS no. 4149-60-4).(b) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), commencing January 1, 2027, no person or entity shall manufacture, sell, deliver, hold, or offer for sale in commerce any cosmetic product that contains any of the following intentionally added ingredients:(1) Lily aldehyde (CAS no. 80-54-6).(2) Acetaldehyde (CAS no. 75-07-0).(3) Cyclohexylamine (CAS no. 108-91-8).(4) Cyclotetrasiloxane (CAS no. 556-67-2).(5) Phytonadione (CAS no. 84-80-0).(6) Sodium perborate (CAS no. 15120-21-5).(7) Styrene (CAS no. 100-42-5).(8) Trichloroacetic acid (CAS no. 76-03-9).(9) Tricresyl phosphate (CAS no. 1330-78-5).(10) Vinyl acetate (CAS no. 108-05-4).(11) 2-Chloracetamide (CAS no. 79-07-2).(12) Allyl isothiocyanate (CAS no. 57-06-7).(13) Anthraquinone (CAS no. 84-65-1).(14) Malachite green (CAS no. 569-64-2).(15) Oil from the seeds of Laurus nobilis L. (CAS no. 84603-73-6).(16) Pyrogallol (CAS no. 87-66-1).(17) C.I. disperse blue 1 (CAS no. 2475-45-8).(18) Trisodium nitrilotriacetate (CAS no. 5064-31-3).(19) The following boron substances:(A) Perboric acids:(i) Sodium salt (CAS no. 11138-47-9).(ii) Sodium salt, monohydrate (CAS no. 12040-72-1).(iii) Sodium perborate monohydrate (CAS no. 10332-33-9).(B) Boric acid (CAS nos. 10043-35-3 and 11113-50-1).(C) Borates, tetraborates, octaborates, and boric acid salts and esters, including all of the following:(i) Disodium octaborate anhydrous (CAS no. 12008-41-2).(ii) Disodium octaborate tetrahydrate (CAS no. 12280-03-4).(iii) 2-Aminoethanol, monoester with boric acid (CAS no. 10377-81-8).(iv) 2-Hydroxypropyl ammonium dihydrogen orthoborate (CAS no. 68003-13-4).(v) Potassium borate, boric acid potassium salt (CAS no. 12712-38-8).(vi) Trioctyldodecyl borate.(vii) Zinc borate (CAS no. 1332-07-6).(viii) Sodium borate, disodium tetraborate anhydrous; boric acid, sodium salt (CAS no. 1330-43-4).(ix) Tetraboron disodium heptaoxide, hydrate (CAS no. 12267-73-1).(x) Orthoboric acid, sodium salt (CAS no. 13840-56-7).(xi) Disodium tetraborate decahydrate; borax decahydrate (CAS no. 1303-96-4).(xii) Disodium tetraborate pentahydrate; borax pentahydrate (CAS no. 12179-04-3).(20) C.I. disperse blue 3 (CAS no. 2475-46-9).(21) Basic green 1 (CAS no. 633-03-4).(22) Basic blue 7 (CAS no. 2390-60-5).(23) 3(or5)-((4-(benzylmethylamino)phenyl)azo)-1,2 -(or1,4)-dimethyl-1H-1,2,4-triazolium and its salts (CAS nos. 89959-98-8 and 12221-69-1).(24) Basic violet 4 (CAS no. 2390-59-2).(25) Basic blue 3 (CAS no. 33203-82-6).(26) Basic blue 9 (CAS no. 61-73-4).(27) Musk ambrette (CAS no. 83-66-9).(28) Musk tibetene (CAS no.145-39-1).(29) Musk moskene (CAS no. 116-66-5).(30) Musk xylene (CAS no. 81-15-2).(c) (1) Commencing January 1, 2027, a person or entity shall not manufacture, sell, deliver, hold, or offer for sale in commerce a cosmetic product that contains more than 1.4 percent in fine fragrance products, 0.56 percent in eau de toilette, 0 percent in oral products, and 0.042 percent in all other products of musk ketone (CAS no. 81-14-1).(2) “Oral products” means a cosmetic product that is intended to be applied on teeth or the mucous membranes of the oral cavity.(d) If a cosmetic product made through manufacturing processes intended to comply with this chapter contains a technically unavoidable trace quantity of an ingredient listed in subdivision (a) or (b) and that trace quantity stems from impurities of natural or synthetic ingredients, the manufacturing process, storage, or migration from packaging, that trace quantity shall not cause the cosmetic product to be in violation of this section.(e) For purposes of this section, “ingredient” has the same meaning as defined in Section 111791.5.(f) (1) Commencing January 1, 2027, a person or entity that manufactures, sells, delivers, holds, or offers for sale in commerce a vaginal suppository product containing intentionally added boric acid (CAS nos. 10043-35-3 and 11113-50-1) shall include on the product label the following statement: “WARNING: IT IS RECOMMENDED TO CONSULT WITH A DOCTOR BEFORE USE, particularly if you have sensitivity in your lower pelvis or abdomen, a sexually transmitted disease (STD), pelvic inflammatory disease (PID), vaginal bleeding, sores, ulcerations, nausea, fever, or chills. Do not use on broken or irritated skin. Stop use and contact a doctor if symptoms persist or worsen, or if you experience irritation, burning, bleeding, or cramping. NOT FOR ORAL CONSUMPTION. FOR VAGINAL USE ONLY. DO NOT USE IF PREGNANT, TRYING TO CONCEIVE, OR NURSING. IF YOU BECOME PREGNANT WHILE USING THIS PRODUCT, DISCONTINUE USE IMMEDIATELY. If swallowed, get medical help or contact Poison Control Center immediately. Some boric acid suppository products may break down a condom—ensure product has completely dissolved before having sex.”(2) Commencing January 1, 2035, no person or entity shall manufacture, sell, deliver, hold, or offer for sale in commerce a vaginal suppository product that contains intentionally added boric acid (CAS nos. 10043-35-3 and 11113-50-1).(3) Paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not apply to a vaginal suppository product containing intentionally added boric acid (CAS nos. 10043-35-3 and 11113-50-1) if the product becomes regulated as a drug by the United States Food and Drug Administration.SEC. 3. Section 2.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 108980 of the Health and Safety Code proposed by this bill and Senate Bill 39. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 108980 of the Health and Safety Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Senate Bill 39, in which case Section 108980 of the Health and Safety Code, as amended by Senate Bill 39, shall remain operative only until the operative date of this bill, at which time Section 2.5 of this bill shall become operative, and Section 2 of this bill shall not become operative.